Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2215
Area agency on aging; department designate.

The department shall designate an area agency on aging for each planning-and-service area designated pursuant to subdivision (6) of section 81-2213.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 15.